nb: Flaskestil: Belgisk; Bordeaux (vin); Burgund (vin); Champagne; Euro (øl); Lommelerke; Growler; Longneck (øl); Patentkork (Grolsch-stil); Annet
bg-BG: Стил на бутилка: Белгийска; Бордо (вино); Бургундия (вино); Шампанско; Евро (бира); Матарка; Гроулър; Дълго гърло (бира); Суинг-топ (тип Grolsch); Друго
cs: Typ/tvar lahve: Belgické; Bordeaux (víno); Burgundské (víno); Šampaňské; Euro (pivo); Placatka; Growler; Longneck (pivo); S pákovým uzávěrem (styl Grolsch); Jiné
zh-TW: 瓶子樣式: 比利時瓶; 波爾多瓶 (葡萄酒); 勃根地瓶 (葡萄酒); 香檳瓶; 歐式瓶 (啤酒); 扁酒瓶; 啤酒外帶瓶; 長頸瓶 (啤酒); 翻蓋瓶 (葛蘭斯風格); 其他
el: Στυλ φιάλης: Βελγικό; Μπορντό (κρασί); Βουργουνδία (κρασί); Σαμπάνια; Ευρωπαϊκό (μπύρα); Φλασκί; Growler; Longneck (μπύρα); Swing-top (τύπου Grolsch); Άλλο
pt-PT: Estilo de garrafa: Belga; Bordéus (vinho); Borgonha (vinho); Champanhe; Euro (cerveja); Cantil; Growler; Gargalo longo (cerveja); Tampa basculante (estilo Grolsch); Outro
nl: Fles model: Belgisch; Bordeaux (wijn); Bourgondisch (wijn); Champagne; Euro (bier); Flacon; Growler; Longneck (bier); Beugelfles; Overige
fi: Pullotyyli: Belgialainen; Bordeaux (viini); Burgundi (viini); Samppanja; Euro (olut); Taskumatti; Growler; Longneck (olut); Patenttikorkki (Grolsch-tyyli); Muu
ja: ボトルスタイル: ベルジャン; ボルドー（ワイン）; ブルゴーニュ（ワイン）; シャンパン; ユーロ（ビール）; フラスコ; グラウラー; ロングネック（ビール）; スイングトップ（グロールシュスタイル）; その他
lt-LT: Butelio stilius: Belgiškas; Bordo (vyno); Burgundiškas (vyno); Šampano; Euro (alaus); Gertuvė; „Growler“; Ilgakaklis (alaus); Lankelinis („Grolsch“ stiliaus); Kitas
ro-RO: Stilul sticlei: Belgiană; Bordeaux (vin); Burgundy (vin); Șampanie; Euro (bere); Ploscă; Growler; Longneck (bere); Swing-top (stil Grolsch); Altele
sl-SI: Slog steklenice: Belgijska; Bordojska (vino); Burgundska (vino); Šampanjska; Euro (pivo); Prisrčnica; Growler; Dolgi vrat (pivo); S patentnim zamaškom (slog Grolsch); Drugo
tr: Şişe stili: Belçika; Bordeaux (şarap); Burgundy (şarap); Şampanya; Euro (bira); Matara; Growler; Uzun boyunlu (bira); Çemberli kapaklı (Grolsch tarzı); Diğer
hu: Palackstílus: Belga; Bordeaux (bor); Burgundia (bor); Pezsgő; Euro (sör); Laposüveg; Growler; Hosszú nyakú (sör); Csatos (Grolsch-stílusú); Egyéb
sv: Flaskstil: Belgisk; Bordeaux (vin); Bourgogne (vin); Champagne; Euro (öl); Fickplunta; Growler; Longneck (öl); Bygelkapsyl (Grolsch-stil); Annan
ru: Тип бутылки: Бельгийская; Бордо (вино); Бургундия (вино); Шампанское; Евро (пиво); Фляга; Гроулер; Лонгнек (пиво); С бугельной пробкой (в стиле Grolsch); Другое
en: Bottle style: Belgian; Bordeaux (wine); Burgundy (wine); Champagne; Euro (beer); Flask; Growler; Longneck (beer); Swing-top (Grolsch-style); Other
zh-CN: 瓶子样式: 比利时酒瓶; 波尔多（葡萄酒）; 勃艮第（葡萄酒）; 香槟; 欧式（啤酒）; 随身酒壶; 鲜啤壶; 长颈（啤酒）; 机械盖（高仕风格）; 其他
da: Flaskestil: Belgisk; Bordeaux (vin); Bourgogne (vin); Champagne; Euro (øl); Lommeflaske; Growler; Longneck (øl); Patentprop (Grolsch-stil); Andet
es: Tipo de botella: Belga; Burdeos (vino); Borgoña (vino); Champán; Euro (cerveza); Petaca; Growler; Cuello largo (cerveza); Cierre mecánico (estilo Grolsch); Otro
hr-HR: Stil boce: Belgijski stil; Bordeaux (vino); Burgundac (vino); Šampanjac; Euro (pivo); Pljoska; Growler; Longneck (pivo); Swing-top (Grolsch stil); Ostalo
vi: Kiểu chai: Bình bia Bỉ; Bordeaux (rượu vang); Burgundy (rượu vang); Champagne; Bình Euro (bia); Bình dẹt; Bình Growler; Cổ dài (bia); Nắp cài (kiểu Grolsch); Khác
pl: Styl butelki: Belgijska; Bordeaux (wino); Burgundzka (wino); Szampańska; Euro (piwo); Piersiówka; Growler; Longneck (piwo); Z zamknięciem pałąkowym (typ Grolsch); Inne
de: Flaschenstil: Belgisch; Bordeaux (Wein); Burgunder (Wein); Champagner; Euro (Bier); Flachmann; Growler; Longneck (Bier); Bügelverschluss (Grolsch-Style); Sonstige
sk-SK: Štýl fľaše: Belgická; Bordeaux (víno); Burgundská (víno); Na šampanské; Euro (pivo); Ploskačka; Džbán na pivo (growler); Longneck (pivo); S patentným uzáverom (štýl Grolsch); Iné
th: รูปแบบขวด: เบลเยียม; บอร์โดซ์ (ไวน์); เบอร์กันดี (ไวน์); แชมเปญ; ยูโร (เบียร์); กระติกพกพา; โกรว์เลอร์; คอยาว (เบียร์); ฝาสวิง (ทรง Grolsch); อื่นๆ
ko: 병 스타일: 벨기에형; 보르도(와인); 부르고뉴(와인); 샴페인; 유로(맥주); 플라스크; 그라울러; 롱넥(맥주); 스윙탑(그롤쉬 스타일); 기타
it: Stile della bottiglia: Belga; Bordeaux (vino); Borgogna (vino); Champagne; Euro (birra); Fiaschetta; Growler; Longneck (birra); Con tappo meccanico (stile Grolsch); Altro
pt-BR: Estilo de garrafa: Belga; Bordeaux (vinho); Borgonha (vinho); Champanhe; Euro (cerveja); Cantil; Growler; Longneck (cerveja); Swing-top (estilo Grolsch); Outros
fr: Style de bouteille: Belge; Bordelaise (vin); Bourguignonne (vin); Champenoise; Euro (bière); Flasque; Cruchon; Long cou (bière); Mécanique (style Grolsch); Autre